el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Θαλάσσια σπορ με ρυμούλκηση > Kneeboarding: Αξεσουάρ για kneeboard; Τσάντες και καλύμματα για kneeboard; Σχοινιά και λαβές kneeboard; Γάντζοι ρυμούλκησης kneeboard; Σανίδες για Kneeboarding
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Vattensporter med draglina > Kneeboarding: Tillbehör för kneeboard; Väskor och överdrag för kneeboard; Linor och handtag för kneeboard; Draghakar för kneeboard; Kneeboards
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Sporty wodne holowane > Kneeboarding: Akcesoria do kneeboardingu; Torby i pokrowce do kneeboardingu; Liny i uchwyty do kneeboardingu; Haki holownicze do kneeboardingu; Deski do kneeboardingu
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Vontatott vízi sportok > Térddeszkázás: Kneeboard-kiegészítők; Kneeboard-táskák és -huzatok; Kneeboard-kötelek és -fogantyúk; Kneeboard vonóhorgok; Térddeszkák
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Towed Water Sports > Kneeboarding: Kneeboard Accessories; Kneeboard Bags & Covers; Kneeboard Ropes & Handles; Kneeboard Tow Hooks; Kneeboards
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Velkamasis vandens sportas > Klūpimųjų banglenčių sportas: Klūpimųjų banglenčių priedai; Klūpimųjų banglenčių krepšiai ir užvalkalai; Kneeboard lynai ir rankenos; Kneeboard tempimo kabliai; Klūpimosios banglentės
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > トーイングアクティビティ > ニーボード用品: ニーボードアクセサリー; ニーボードバッグ・カバー; ニーボードロープ・ハンドル; ニーボード用トウフック; ニーボード
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Watersporten met motorische aandrijving > Kneeboarden: Kneeboard-accessoires; Kneeboardtassen en -hoezen; Kneeboard-lijnen en -handvatten; Kneeboard-trekhaken; Kneeboards
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Vesiurheilulajit veneen perässä > Kneeboarding: Polvilaudan tarvikkeet; Polvilaudan laukut ja suojukset; Polvilaudan köydet ja kahvat; Polvilaudan vetokoukut; Polvilaudat
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Vlečné vodní sporty > Jízda na klekacích prknech: Příslušenství pro kneeboardy; Tašky a obaly na kneeboardy; Lana a madla pro kneeboardy; Vlečné háky na kneeboardy; Klekací prkna
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Vandsport, hvor man trækkes > Kneeboarding: Tilbehør til kneeboards; Tasker og betræk til kneeboards; Træktove og håndtag til kneeboards; Trækkroge til kneeboards; Kneeboards
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Deportes acuáticos remolcados > Surf de rodillas: Accesorios para kneeboard; Bolsas y fundas para kneeboard; Cuerdas y manillares para kneeboard; Ganchos de remolque para kneeboard; Tablas para surf de rodillas
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos aquáticos de reboque > Kneeboard: Acessórios para kneeboard; Sacos e capas para kneeboard; Cordas e pegas para kneeboard; Ganchos de reboque para kneeboard; Pranchas de kneeboard
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Sport nautici con traino > Kneeboard: Accessori per kneeboard; Borse e sacche per kneeboard; Corde e maniglie per kneeboard; Ganci di traino per kneeboard; Tavole per sci nautico
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > กีฬาทางน้ำแบบลาก > การเล่นบอร์ดนั่ง: อุปกรณ์เสริมกระดานคุกเข่าโต้คลื่น; กระเป๋าและที่หุ้มกระดานคุกเข่าโต้คลื่น; เชือกและมือจับกระดานคุกเข่าโต้คลื่น; ตะขอลากกระดานคุกเข่าโต้คลื่น; บอร์ดนั่ง
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Esportes aquáticos rebocados > Kneeboarding: Acessórios para kneeboard; Bolsas e capas para kneeboard; Cordas e manetes para kneeboard; Ganchos de reboque para kneeboard; Kneeboards
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Sports nautiques tractés > Kneeboard: Accessoires de kneeboard; Sacs et housses de kneeboard; Cordes et palonniers de kneeboard; Crochets de remorquage pour kneeboard; Planches de kneeboard
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Seilgebundene Wassersportarten > Kneeboarding: Kneeboard-Zubehör; Kneeboard-Taschen & -Hüllen; Kneeboard-Leinen & -Hanteln; Kneeboard-Zughaken; Kneeboards
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Vlečni športi na vodi > Kneeboarding: Dodatki za kneeboard deske; Torbe in pokrivala za kneeboard deske; Vrvi in ročaji za kneeboard deske; Vlečne kljuke za kneeboard deske; Kneeboard deske
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Trukket vannsport > Kneboarding: Tilbehør til knebrett; Bager og trekk til knebrett; Tau og håndtak til knebrett; Slepekroker til knebrett; Kneboards
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Водни спортове с теглене > Нийборд: Аксесоари за нийборд; Чанти и покривала за нийборд; Въжета и ръкохватки за нийборд; Куки за теглене на нийборд; Нийборди
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Çekmeli Su Sporları > Kneeboard Sporu: Kneeboard aksesuarları; Kneeboard çantaları ve kılıfları; Kneeboard halat ve tutamaçları; Kneeboard çekme kancaları; Kneeboard Tahtaları
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 견인식 수상 스포츠 > 니보딩: 니보드 액세서리; 니보드 가방 및 커버; 니보드 로프 및 핸들; 니보드 견인 훅; 니보드
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 纜繩滑水 > 跪式滑水: 跪板配件; 跪板收納袋與保護套; 跪板拖水繩與把手; 跪板拖曳鉤; 跪式滑水板
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 滑水用品 > 跪板滑水: 跪板配件; 跪板包与保护套; 跪板拖绳与把手; 跪板拖钩; 跪式滑水板
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván có thuyền kéo > Lướt ván quỳ: Phụ kiện ván quỳ; Túi và vỏ bọc ván quỳ; Dây và tay cầm ván quỳ; Móc kéo ván quỳ; Ván lướt quỳ
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Катание по воде за катером > Нибординг: Аксессуары для нибординга; Чехлы и сумки для нибордов; Фалы и рукоятки для нибординга; Буксировочные крюки для нибордов; Ниборды
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Vučni vodeni sportovi > Kneeboard: Dodaci za dasku za kneeboarding; Torbe i navlake za dasku za kneeboarding; Užad i ručke za kneeboard; Kuke za vuču za kneeboard; Kneeboard daske
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Vlečné vodné športy > Kneeboarding: Príslušenstvo pre kneeboard; Tašky a obaly na kneeboard; Lana a rukoväte na kneeboard; Závesné háky pre kolenné dosky; Kneeboardy
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Sporturi nautice cu remorcare > Kneeboarding: Accesorii pentru kneeboard; Genți și huse pentru kneeboard; Frânghii și mânere pentru kneeboard; Cârlige de remorcare pentru kneeboard; Plăci pentru kneeboarding